Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2216
Real property appraiser, defined.

Real property appraiser means a person who is a credential holder.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 34;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 30;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 64.